Washington statutes.
RCW 18.39.300

Grounds for disciplinary action.

In addition to the grounds for action set forth in RCW 18.235.130, the board may take the disciplinary action set forth in RCW 18.235.110 against the funeral establishment's license, the license of any funeral director and/or the funeral establishment's certificate of registration, if the licensee or registrant:

(1) Fails to comply with any provisions of this chapter or any proper order or regulation of the board;

(2) Is found by the board to be in such condition that further execution of prearrangement contracts could be hazardous to purchasers or beneficiaries and the people of this state;

(3) Refuses to be examined, or refuses to submit to examination by the board when required;

(4) Fails to pay the expense of an examination; or

(5) Is found by the board after investigation or receipt of reliable information to be managed by persons who are incompetent or untrustworthy or so lacking in managerial experience as to make the proposed or continued execution or servicing of prearrangement funeral service contracts hazardous to purchasers, beneficiaries, or to the public.

[ 2002 c 86 s 219; 1989 c 390 s 7; 1986 c 259 s 70; 1982 c 66 s 6.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2002 c 86: See note following RCW 18.08.340.

Part headings not law—Severability—2002 c 86: See RCW 18.235.902 and 18.235.903.

Severability—1986 c 259: See note following RCW 18.130.010.

Effective dates—Transfer of records, files, and pending business—Savings—1982 c 66: See notes following RCW 18.39.240.